Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.030

"Transfer station" defined.

As used in RCW 36.58.030 through 36.58.060, the term "transfer station" means a staffed, fixed supplemental facility used by persons and route collection vehicles to deposit solid wastes into transfer trailers for transportation to a disposal site. This does not include detachable containers, except in counties with a population of less than seventy thousand, and in any county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand that is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range, where detachable containers shall be securely fenced, staffed by an attendant during all hours when the detachable container is open to the public, charge a tipping fee that shall cover the cost of providing and for use of the service, and shall be operated as a transfer station.

[ 1991 c 363 s 74; 1989 c 431 s 27; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 58 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.